District of Columbia statutes.
50-1708

Rules; public information program.

Within 180 days from March 7, 1992, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement this chapter and, through public or private programs, shall maintain a child restraint seat loan program for residents of the District of Columbia, and make available to the public information about this chapter.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 9, 30 DCR 49
Mar. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-57, § 2(e), 38 DCR 7283
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 34, 40 DCR 6311
1981 Ed., § 40-1208.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-194, see Mayor’s Order 83-174, June 23, 1983.